Massachusetts, session 194th, H5623.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Subsection (c) of section 58 of chapter 140 of the General Laws, as 
appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:- 
(9) As used in this paragraph “MIADA” shall mean the Massachusetts Independent 
Automobile Dealers Association, Inc. The person shall attend 8 hours of educational training 
related to the rules, regulations and laws pertaining to the used car industry to be provided by an 
organization certified by MIADA to provide educational training. MIADA shall: (i) establish the 
minimum core curriculum to be presented by certified training organizations; (ii) establish a 
standardized test, which shall be administered by all certified educational training organizations 
to persons attending the educational training; and (iii) consult with the National Independent 
Automobile Association in establishing the said core curriculum and standardized test pursuant 
to clauses (i) and (ii). Upon an applicant’s successful completion of the training and obtaining a 
passing grade, the organization providing the training shall issue a Class 2 education certificate 
to the person. The Class 2 education certificate shall be developed by the MIADA and include on 
the face a certificate number. All certified training organizations shall record the name and 

of 2 15 certificate number of all certificates issued to applicants successfully completing the educational 
training. A municipal licensing authority shall not issue or renew a Class 2 license unless a Class 
2 education certificate is presented to the licensing authority by the Class 2 licensee applicant. 
All Class 2 licensees who have successfully obtained a Class 2 education certificate shall 
thereafter attend 4 hours of continuing educational training every 2 years. Class 2 licensees shall 
be issued a continuing education certificate which shall also be a condition precedent to 
renewing a Class 2 license. 
SECTION 2. Beginning July 1, 2027, a municipal licensing authority shall not issue a 
new Class 2 license or renew a Class 2 license, pursuant to section 58 of chapter 140 of the 
General Laws, that was issued prior to July 1, 2027, unless a Class 2 education certificate is 
presented to the licensing authority by the Class 2 licensee applicant.